Vermont, session 2025-2026, H433.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. PURPOSE
The purpose of this act is to initiate the incremental implementation of
Green Mountain Care by starting to provide comprehensive, affordable, high-
quality, publicly financed health care for all Vermonters in accordance with the
principles established in 2011 Acts and Resolves No. 48. The act gradually
expands the benefits available through Green Mountain Care over 10 years,
beginning with publicly financed primary care in the first year, adding
preventive dental and vision care in the second year, and adding the remaining
health care services according to a schedule recommended by the Green
Mountain Care Board’s Universal Health Care Advisory Group. It is the intent
of the General Assembly that, by the 10th year, the Green Mountain Care
VT LEG #379265 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.433
2025 Page 3 of 24
benefit package should be at least as comprehensive as the benefit package
contemplated for the program in 2011 Acts and Resolves No. 48.
Sec. 2. 33 V.S.A. chapter 18, subchapter 2 is amended to read:
Subchapter 2. Green Mountain Care
* * *
§ 1822. IMPLEMENTATION; WAIVER
(a) Green Mountain Care shall be implemented 90 days following the last
to occur of:
(1) Receipt receipt of a waiver under Section 1332 of the Affordable
Care Act pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.; and
(2) Enactment of a law establishing the financing for Green Mountain
Care. [Repealed.]
(3) Approval by the Green Mountain Care Board of the initial Green
Mountain Care benefit package pursuant to 18 V.S.A. § 9375. [Repealed.]
(4) Enactment enactment of the appropriations for the initial first year of
Green Mountain Care benefit package proposed by the Green Mountain Care
Board pursuant to 18 V.S.A. § 9375 based on the first-year benefits set forth in
subdivision 1825(a)(1) of this chapter.
(5) A determination by the Green Mountain Care Board, as the result of
a detailed and transparent analysis, that each of the following conditions will
be met:
VT LEG #379265 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.433
2025 Page 4 of 24
(A) Each Vermont resident covered by Green Mountain Care will
receive benefits with an actuarial value of 80 percent or greater.
(B) When implemented, Green Mountain Care will not have a
negative aggregate impact on Vermont’s economy. This determination shall
include an analysis of the impact of implementation on economic growth.
(C) The financing for Green Mountain Care is sustainable. In this
analysis, the Board shall consider at least a five-year revenue forecast using the
consensus process established in 32 V.S.A. § 305a, projections of federal and
other funds available to support Green Mountain Care, and estimated expenses
for Green Mountain Care for an equivalent time period.
(D) Administrative expenses in Vermont’s health care system for
which data are available will be reduced below 2011 levels, adjusted for
inflation and other factors as necessary to reflect the present value of 2011
dollars at the time of the analysis.
(E) Cost-containment efforts will result in a reduction in the rate of
growth in Vermont’s per-capita health care spending without reducing access
to necessary care or resulting in excessive wait times for services.
(F) Health care professionals will be reimbursed at levels sufficient to
allow Vermont to recruit and retain high-quality health care professionals.
[Repealed.]
VT LEG #379265 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.433
2025 Page 5 of 24
(b)(1) As soon as allowed under federal law, the Secretary of
Administration The Secretary of Human Services shall seek a waiver under
Section 1332 of the Affordable Care Act to:
(A) allow the State to suspend operation of modify the benefit
package for the qualified health plans offered through the Vermont Health
Benefit Exchange as appropriate to reflect the expansion of coverage through
Green Mountain Care; and to
(B) enable Vermont to receive the appropriate federal fund
contribution in lieu of the federal premium tax credits, cost-sharing subsidies,
and small business tax credits provided in the Affordable Care Act to the
extent that reductions in premiums and out-of-pocket costs are attributable to
the availability of coverage for certain health care services through Green
Mountain Care.
(2) The Secretary may seek a waiver from other provisions of the
Affordable Care Act as necessary to ensure the operation of Green Mountain
Care.
(c) The Green Mountain Care Board’s analysis prepared pursuant to
subdivision (a)(5) of this section shall be made available to the General
Assembly and the public and shall include:
(1) a complete fiscal projection of revenues and expenses, as described
in subdivision (a)(5) of this section, including reserves, if recommended, and
VT LEG #379265 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.433
2025 Page 6 of 24
other costs in addition to the cost of services, over at least a five-year period
for a public-private universal health care system providing benefits with an
actuarial value of 80 percent or greater;
(2) the financing plans provided to the General Assembly in January
2013 pursuant to 2011 Acts and Resolves No. 48, Sec. 9;
(3) an analysis of how implementing Green Mountain Care will further
the principles of health care reform expressed in 18 V.S.A. § 9371 beyond the
reforms established through the Blueprint for Health; and
(4) a comparison of best practices for reducing health care costs in self-
funded plans, if available. [Repealed.]
* * *
§ 1825. HEALTH BENEFITS
(a)(1) Green Mountain Care shall include primary care, preventive care,
chronic care, acute episodic care, and hospital services and shall include at
least the same covered services as those included in the benefit package in
effect for the lowest cost Catamount Health plan offered on January 1, 2011.
(2) It is the intent of the General Assembly that Green Mountain Care
provide a level of coverage that includes benefits that are actuarially equivalent
to at least 87 percent of the full actuarial value of the covered health services.
(3) The Green Mountain Care Board shall consider whether to impose
cost-sharing requirements; if so, whether to make the cost-sharing
VT LEG #379265 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.433
2025 Page 7 of 24
requirements income-sensitized; and the impact of any cost-sharing
requirements on an individual’s ability to access care. The Board shall
consider waiving any cost-sharing requirement for evidence-based primary and
preventive care; for palliative care; and for chronic care for individuals
participating in chronic care management and, where circumstances warrant,
for individuals with chronic conditions who are not participating in a chronic
care management program.
(4)(A) The Green Mountain Care Board established in 18 V.S.A.
chapter 220 shall consider whether to include dental, vision, and hearing
benefits in the Green Mountain Care benefit package.
(B) The Green Mountain Care Board shall consider whether to
include long-term care benefits in the Green Mountain Care benefit package.
(1) In the first year of its implementation, the Green Mountain Care
benefit package shall consist of:
(A) all primary care services, including outpatient mental health
services and services for treatment of substance use disorder;
(B) all testing necessary for the diagnosis of communicable diseases;
and
(C) all vaccines recommended by the Centers for Disease Control
and Prevention.
VT LEG #379265 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.433
2025 Page 8 of 24
(2) There shall be no co-payment, coinsurance, deductible, or other cost-
sharing requirement for the services listed in subdivision (1) of this subsection
at any time.
(b)(1) In the second year of its implementation, the Green Mountain Care
benefit package shall consist of the benefits set forth in subsection (a) of this
section, as well as:
(A) all prophylactic dental services, including two cleaning visits and
dental exams per year, fluoride treatment as prescribed by a dentist, and annual
dental x-rays;
(B) one vision exam per year, as well as screening for glaucoma and
macular disease, if indicated; and
(C) hearing aids, when medically necessary and prescribed, fitted,
and dispensed by a hearing care professional.
(2) There shall be no co-payment, coinsurance, deductible, or other cost-
sharing requirement for the services listed in subdivision (1) of this subsection
at any time.
(c)(1) The Green Mountain Care benefit package for years three through 10
shall consist of the benefits set forth in subsections (a) and (b) of this section,
with additional services to be added by the General Assembly based on
recommendations from the Green Mountain Care Board’s Universal Health
Care Advisory Group, which shall prioritize the addition of the following:
VT LEG #379265 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.433
2025 Page 9 of 24
(A) all prenatal and maternal care;
(B) all neonatal care;
(C) all standard diagnostic screenings at recommended intervals,
including mammography, colonoscopy, blood glucose, blood cholesterol, bone
density, and hearing testing;
(D) all medically necessary dental services, including dentures;
(E) all emergency services, including ambulance and emergency
medical technician services;
(F) all physical therapy services prescribed by a health care
professional;
(G) all durable medical equipment and prostheses prescribed by a
health care professional;
(H) specialty care and outpatient treatment, including outpatient
surgery and oncology services;
(I) home health and hospice care prescribed by a health care
professional; and
(J) hospital inpatient care.
(2) The Green Mountain Care Board’s Universal Health Care Advisory
Group shall also recommend to the General Assembly whether and to what
extent the Green Mountain Care benefit package should include prescription
VT LEG #379265 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.433
2025 Page 10 of 24
drugs, rehabilitation services in a skilled nursing facility, and long-term care in
a skilled nursing facility.
(3) The Green Mountain Care Board’s Universal Health Care Advisory
Group may consider recommending to the General Assembly reasonable co-
payment, but not coinsurance or deductible, requirements for services included
in the Green Mountain Care benefit package for years three through 10.
(4) It is the intent of the General Assembly that, by the 10th year of
Green Mountain Care, the Green Mountain Care benefit package should be at
least as comprehensive as the benefit package contemplated for the program in
2011 Acts and Resolves No. 48.
(5)(d) Green Mountain Care shall not limit coverage of preexisting
conditions.
(6)(e) The Green Mountain Care Board shall approve the benefit
package annually based on the provisions of subsections (a) through (c) of this
section and present it to the General Assembly as part of its recommendations
for the Green Mountain Care budget.
(b)(f)(1)(A) For individuals an individual eligible for Medicaid or CHIP,
the benefits for each year shall include all benefits included in the Green
Mountain Care benefit package for that year to the extent those benefits exceed
the benefits available to the individual through Medicaid or CHIP, as
applicable. If the Agency successfully obtains Medicaid and CHIP waivers
VT LEG #379265 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.433
2025 Page 11 of 24
under subdivision 1827(g)(1) of this chapter, the benefit package shall include
the benefits required by federal law, as well as any additional benefits provided
as part of the Green Mountain Care benefit package.
(B) Upon implementation of Green Mountain Care, the benefit
package for individuals eligible for Medicaid or CHIP shall also include any
optional Medicaid benefits pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 1396d or services covered
under the State plan for CHIP as provided in 42 U.S.C. § 1397cc for which
these individuals are eligible on January 1, 2014. Beginning with the second
year of Green Mountain Care and going forward, the Green Mountain Care
Board may, consistent with federal law, modify these optional benefits, as long
as at all times the benefit package for these individuals contains at least the
benefits described in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (b)(1).
(2) For children eligible for benefits paid for with Medicaid funds, the
benefit package provided following receipt of Medicaid and CHIP waivers
under subdivision 1827(g)(1) of this chapter shall include early and periodic
screening, diagnosis, and treatment services as defined under federal law.
(3) For individuals an individual eligible for Medicare, the benefits for
each year shall include all benefits included in the Green Mountain Care
benefit package for that year to the extent those benefits exceed the benefits
available to the individual through Medicare. If the Agency successfully
obtains a Medicare waiver under subdivision 1827(g)(2) of this chapter, the
VT LEG #379265 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.433
2025 Page 12 of 24
benefit package shall include the benefits provided to these individuals under
federal law, as well as any additional benefits provided as part of the Green
Mountain Care benefit package.
(4) For an individual eligible for health care coverage through the
U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs, TRICARE, or the Federal Employees
Health Benefits Program, the benefit package shall include all benefits
included in the Green Mountain Care benefit package for that year to the extent
those benefits exceed the benefits available to the individual through the
applicable federal program.
(5) The Green Mountain Care benefits for individuals eligible for the
health care programs described in subdivisions (1)–(4) of this subsection shall
include coverage of any co-payment, coinsurance, and deductible amounts
attributable to health care services that would have been covered without cost-
sharing under Green Mountain Care at the time the individual received the
services. If the services would have included a cost-sharing requirement under
Green Mountain Care at the time the individual received the services, Green
Mountain Care shall cover any applicable cost-sharing amount to the extent it
exceeds the cost-sharing amount for those services under Green Mountain
Care.
* * *
§ 1827. ADMINISTRATION; ENROLLMENT
VT LEG #379265 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.433
2025 Page 13 of 24
(a)(1) The Agency shall, under an open bidding process, solicit bids from
and award contracts to public or private entities for administration of certain
elements of Green Mountain Care, such as claims administration and provider
relations.
(2) The Agency shall ensure that entities awarded contracts pursuant to
this subsection do not have a financial incentive to restrict individuals’ access
to health services. The Agency may establish performance measures that
provide incentives for contractors to provide timely, accurate, transparent, and
courteous services to individuals enrolled in Green Mountain Care and to
health care professionals.
(3) When considering contract bids pursuant to this subsection, the
Agency shall consider the interests of the State relating to the economy, the
location of the entity, and the need to maintain and create jobs in Vermont.
The Agency may utilize an econometric model to evaluate the net costs of each
contract bid.
(b) Nothing in this subchapter shall require an individual with health
coverage other than Green Mountain Care to terminate that coverage.
(c) An individual enrolled in Green Mountain Care may elect to maintain
supplemental health insurance if the individual so chooses.
(d) Except for cost-sharing as permitted by the General Assembly for
services included in the Green Mountain Care benefit package for years three
VT LEG #379265 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.433
2025 Page 14 of 24
through 10, Vermonters shall not be billed any additional amount for health
services covered by Green Mountain Care.
(e) The Agency shall issue to each Vermont resident an electronic benefit
card that enables the individual named on the card to receive services covered
by Green Mountain Care. The Agency shall update annually the database of
covered services that the card enables the cardholder to receive through Green
Mountain Care to align with the expansion of the Green Mountain Care benefit
package pursuant to section 1825 of this chapter.
(f) Green Mountain Care shall be the payer of last resort with respect to any
health service that may be covered in whole or in part by any other health
benefit plan, including Medicaid, CHIP, Medicare, private health insurance,
retiree health benefits, or federal health benefit plans offered by the military or
to federal employees.
(g)(1) The Agency may seek a waiver under Section 1115 of the Social
Security Act to include Medicaid and under Section 2107(e)(2)(A) of the
Social Security Act to include CHIP in Green Mountain Care. If the Agency is
unsuccessful in obtaining one or both of these waivers, Green Mountain Care
shall be the secondary payer with respect to any health service that may be
covered in whole or in part by Title XIX of the Social Security Act (Medicaid)
or Title XXI of the Social Security Act (CHIP), as applicable.
VT LEG #379265 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.433
2025 Page 15 of 24
(2) The Agency may seek a waiver from the Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services to include Medicare in Green Mountain Care. If the
Agency is unsuccessful in obtaining a Medicare waiver, Green Mountain Care
shall be the secondary payer with respect to any health service that may be
covered in whole or in part by Title XVIII (Medicare) of the Social Security
Act.
(h) Any prescription drug coverage offered by Green Mountain Care shall
be consistent with the standards and procedures applicable to the pharmacy
best practices and cost control program established in section 1998 of this title.
(i) Green Mountain Care shall maintain a robust and adequate network of
health care professionals located in Vermont or regularly serving Vermont
residents, including mental health and substance abuse professionals. The
Agency shall contract with outside entities as needed to allow for the
appropriate portability of coverage under Green Mountain Care for Vermont
residents who are temporarily out of the State.
(j)(1) The Agency shall make available the necessary information, forms,
access to eligibility or enrollment systems, and billing procedures to health
care professionals to ensure immediate enrollment for individuals in Green
Mountain Care at the point of service or treatment.
(2) Health care professionals shall submit claims to the Agency
electronically for covered services delivered to Vermont residents.
VT LEG #379265 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.433
2025 Page 16 of 24
(3)(A) To the extent health care professionals are reimbursed on a fee-
for-service basis for services covered by Green Mountain Care, the Agency
shall establish a single, standard reimbursement rate for each covered service,
regardless of the type of health care professional delivering the care. The
standard reimbursement rate shall be based on a percentage of the Medicare
rate for the service, to the extent applicable.
(B) The Green Mountain Care Board may recommend to the General
Assembly payment mechanisms other than fee-for-service for services covered
by Green Mountain Care.
(k) An individual aggrieved by an adverse decision of the Agency or plan
administrator may appeal to the Human Services Board as provided in
3 V.S.A. § 3090.
(l) The Agency, in collaboration with the Department of Financial
Regulation, shall monitor the extent to which residents of other states move to
Vermont for the purpose of receiving health services and the impact, positive
or negative, of any such migration on Vermont’s health care system and on the
State’s economy, and make appropriate recommendations to the General
Assembly based on its findings.
* * *
Sec. 3. 18 V.S.A. § 9384 is added to read:
§ 9384. UNIVERSAL HEALTH CARE ADVISORY GROUP
VT LEG #379265 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.433
2025 Page 17 of 24
(a) Creation. There is created the Universal Health Care Advisory Group
to advise the Green Mountain Care Board and the General Assembly regarding
the implementation and financing of Green Mountain Care.
(b) Membership. The Advisory Group shall be composed of the following
members:
(1) the Chair of the Green Mountain Care Board or designee;
(2) the Commissioner of Taxes or designee;
(3) the Chief Health Care Advocate in the Office of the Health Care
Advocate or designee;
(4) one member of the public who represents agriculture or small
business and who is not currently a member of the General Assembly,
appointed by the Governor;
(5) one member of the public who represents wage earners or organized
labor and who is not currently a member of the General Assembly, appointed
by the Speaker of the House;
(6) one member of the public who is a primary care clinician and who is
not currently a member of the General Assembly, appointed by the Speaker of
the House;
(7) one member of the public who represents older, chronically ill, or
disabled Vermonters and who is not currently a member of the General
Assembly, appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate;
VT LEG #379265 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.433
2025 Page 18 of 24
(8) one member of the public who represents an organization that
advocates for universal health care and who is not currently a member of the
General Assembly, appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate; and
(9) one member of the public who is an economist or a tax policy
analyst, appointed by the Chair of the Joint Fiscal Committee.
(c) Powers and duties; report. The Advisory Group shall report annually to
the General Assembly on or before January 15 regarding:
(1) the Advisory Group’s recommendations for the sequencing of
publicly funded health care services to be added to the Green Mountain Care
benefit package in years three through 10 of the program pursuant to 33 V.S.A.
§ 1825(c)(1);
(2) the Advisory Group’s recommendations with respect to whether and
to what extent the Green Mountain Care benefit package should include
prescription drugs, rehabilitation services in a skilled nursing facility, and
long-term care in a skilled nursing facility;
(3) the Advisory Group’s recommendations with respect to whether
Green Mountain Care should include reasonable co-payment requirements for
services included in the Green Mountain Care benefit package for years three
through 10 and, if so, for which services and in what amounts;
(4) the Advisory Group’s recommendations for the financing of Green
Mountain Care for years three through 10 of the program and beyond; and
VT LEG #379265 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.433
2025 Page 19 of 24
(5) the frequency with which the Advisory Group believes it should
meet in the years following the first year of the Advisory Group’s existence
and its projected funding needs for payment of per diem compensation and
reimbursement of expenses in accordance with subsection (f) of this section for
the ensuing year.
(d) Assistance. The Advisory Group shall have the administrative,
technical, and legal assistance of the Green Mountain Care Board.
(e) Meetings.
(1) The Chair of the Green Mountain Care Board shall call the first
meeting of the Advisory Group to occur on or before September 1, 2025.
(2) At its first meeting, the Advisory Group shall elect a chair and vice
chair from among its appointed members of the public.
(3) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
(4) The Advisory Group shall meet at least monthly during its first year
and shall recommend to the General Assembly the frequency with which the
Advisory Group believes it should meet in the following years.
(f) Compensation and reimbursement.
(1) For attendance at meetings during adjournment of the General
Assembly, a legislative member of the Advisory Group serving in the
member’s capacity as a legislator shall be entitled to per diem compensation
and reimbursement of expenses pursuant to 2 V.S.A. § 23 for not more than
VT LEG #379265 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.433
2025 Page 20 of 24
12 meetings in the first year of the Advisory Group’s existence and as
approved by the General Assembly for the following years. These payments
shall be made from monies appropriated to the General Assembly.
(2) The public members of the Advisory Group appointed pursuant to
subdivisions (b)(4)–(9) of this section shall be entitled to per diem
compensation and reimbursement of expenses as permitted under 32 V.S.A.
§ 1010 for not more than 12 meetings in the first year of the Advisory Group’s
existence and as approved by the General Assembly for the following
years. These payments shall be made from monies appropriated to the Green
Mountain Care Board.
Sec. 4. GREEN MOUNTAIN CARE; FINANCING; INTENT
(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly that Green Mountain Care may
be financed as follows:
(1) by a payroll tax levied on all employers and a tax on self-
employment income;
(2) by an income tax surcharge; and
(3) as may be determined by the General Assembly following receipt of
the recommendations of the Universal Health Care Advisory Group in
accordance with 18 V.S.A. § 9384.
VT LEG #379265 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.433
2025 Page 21 of 24
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly that revenues raised under this
section shall be deposited into the Green Mountain Care Fund established in 33
V.S.A. § 1829.
Sec. 5. 8 V.S.A. § 4062 is amended to read:
§ 4062. FILING AND APPROVAL OF POLICY FORMS AND PREMIUMS
(a)(1) No policy of health insurance or certificate under a policy filed by an
insurer offering health insurance as defined in subdivision 3301(a)(2) of this
title, a nonprofit hospital or medical service corporation, a health maintenance
organization, or a managed care organization and not exempted by subdivision
3368(a)(4) of this title shall be delivered or issued for delivery in this State, nor
shall any endorsement, rider, or application that becomes a part of any such
policy be used, until a copy of the form and of the rules for the classification of
risks has been filed with the Department of Financial Regulation and a copy of
the premium rates has been filed with the Green Mountain Care Board; and the
Green Mountain Care Board has issued a decision approving, modifying, or
disapproving the proposed rate.
* * *
(3) The Board shall determine whether a rate is affordable,; promotes
quality care,; promotes access to health care,; protects insurer solvency,; does
not reflect duplication of the coverage provided by Green Mountain Care; and
is not unjust, unfair, inequitable, misleading, or contrary to the laws of this
VT LEG #379265 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.433
2025 Page 22 of 24
State. In making this determination, the Board shall consider the analysis and
opinion provided by the Department of Financial Regulation pursuant to
subdivision (2)(B) of this subsection.
* * *
(h)(1) The authority of the Board under this section shall apply only to the
rate review process for policies for major medical insurance coverage and shall
not apply to the policy forms for major medical insurance coverage or to the
rate and policy form review process for policies for specific disease, accident,
injury, hospital indemnity, dental care, vision care, disability income, long-
term care, student health insurance coverage, Medicare supplemental coverage,
or other limited benefit coverage; to short-term, limited-duration health
insurance coverage; or to benefit plans that are paid directly to an individual
insured or to his or her the individual’s assigns and for which the amount of the
benefit is not based on potential medical costs or actual costs incurred.
Premium rates and rules for the classification of risk for Medicare
supplemental insurance policies shall be governed by sections 4062b and
4080e of this title.
(2) The policy forms for major medical insurance coverage, as well as
the policy forms, premium rates, and rules for the classification of risk for the
other lines of insurance described in subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be
reviewed and approved or disapproved by the Commissioner. In making his or
VT LEG #379265 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.433
2025 Page 23 of 24
her the determination, the Commissioner shall consider whether a policy form,
premium rate, or rule is affordable; does not duplicate coverage provided by
Green Mountain Care; and is not unjust, unfair, inequitable, misleading, or
contrary to the laws of this State; and, for a policy form for major medical
insurance coverage, whether it ensures equal access to appropriate mental
health care in a manner equivalent to other aspects of health care as part of an
integrated, holistic system of care. The Commissioner shall make his or her
the determination within 30 days after the date the insurer filed the policy
form, premium rate, or rule with the Department. At the expiration of the 30-
day period, the form, premium rate, or rule shall be deemed approved unless
prior to then it has been affirmatively approved or disapproved by the
Commissioner or found to be incomplete. The Commissioner shall notify an
insurer in writing if the insurer files any form, premium rate, or rule containing
a provision that does not meet the standards expressed in this subsection. In
such notice, the Commissioner shall state that a hearing will be granted within
20 days upon the insurer’s written request.
* * *
Sec. 6. IMPLEMENTATION; INTENT
It is the intent of the General Assembly that the first year of Green
Mountain Care’s implementation begin on January 1, 2027.
Sec. 7. EFFECTIVE DATE
VT LEG #379265 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.433
2025 Page 24 of 24
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379265 v.1